North Dakota statutes. TITLE 62.1 Weapons
CHAPTER 62.1-01 Definitions — General Provisions

62.1-01-01.
General definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dangerous weapon” includes any switchblade or gravity knife, machete, scimitar, stiletto, sword, dagger, or knife with a blade of five inches [12.7 centimeters] or more; any throwing star, nunchaku, or other martial arts weapon; any billy, blackjack, sap, bludgeon, cudgel, metal knuckles, or sand club; any slungshot; any bow and arrow, crossbow, or spear; any weapon that will expel, or is readily capable of expelling, a projectile by the action of a spring, compressed air, or compressed gas, including any such weapon, loaded or unloaded, commonly referred to as a BB gun, air rifle, or CO2 gun; and any projector of a bomb or any object containing or capable of producing and emitting any noxious liquid, gas, or substance. “Dangerous weapon” does not include a spray or aerosol containing CS, also known as ortho-chlorobenzamalonitrile; CN, also known as alpha-chloroacetophenone; or other irritating agent intended for use in the defense of an individual, nor does the term include a device that uses voltage for the defense of an individual, unless the device uses a projectile and voltage or the device uses a projectile and may be used to apply multiple applications of voltage during a single incident, then the term includes the device for an individual who is prohibited from possessing a firearm under this title.

“Direct supervision of an adult” means that an adult is present in such close proximity so as to be capable of observing and directing the actions of the individual supervised.

“Firearm” or “weapon” means any device that expels or is readily capable of expelling a projectile by the action of an explosive and includes any such device, loaded or unloaded, commonly referred to as a pistol, revolver, rifle, gun, machine gun, shotgun, bazooka, or cannon.

“Gaming site” means any room or premises licensed by the attorney general or by a city or county governing body to conduct legal gaming operations.

“Government building” means a building which is owned, possessed, or used by or leased to the state of North Dakota, or any of its political subdivisions.

“Handgun” means any firearm that is not designed to be fired from the shoulder, which has a barrel less than sixteen inches [40.64 centimeters] long, and which is capable of firing, by the energy of an explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge, an exposed projectile through a rifled bore. The term includes all firearms that are designed to be readily modified between rifle and pistol forms, if in compliance with the National Firearms Act [26 U.S.C. 5801-5872].

“Law enforcement officer” means:

A public servant authorized by law or by a government agency or branch to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations or prosecutions for violations of law; or

A retired public servant in good standing who:

Was authorized by law or by a government agency or branch for at least ten years to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations or prosecutions for violations of law or who was separated from service due to a service-related physical disability;

Maintains the same level of firearms proficiency as is required by the peace officers standards and training board for law enforcement officers, maintains the standards for qualifications in firearms training for active law enforcement officers as determined by the former agency of the individual in the state in which the individual resides, or maintains the standards used by a certified firearms instructor qualified to conduct a firearms qualification test for active duty officers in the state in which the individual resides;

Has a photo identification card issued by a local law enforcement agency which identifies the individual as having been employed by a government agency or branch as a law enforcement officer and indicates the individual has passed the firearms proficiency test within twelve months from the date of issue; and

Has not been found by a qualified medical professional to be unqualified for reasons relating to mental health or entered an agreement with a government agency or branch in which the public servant acknowledges a lack of qualifications for reasons relating to the mental health of the public servant.

“Machine gun, submachine gun, or fully automatic rifle” means a firearm, mechanism, or instrument not requiring that the trigger be pressed for each shot, and having a reservoir, belt, or other means of storing and carrying ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument and fired therefrom at a rate of five or more shots to the second. The term does not include a binary trigger that fires one round upon the pull of the trigger and one round upon release of the trigger.

“Mentally deficient individual” means any individual, minor or adult other than a mentally ill individual, who is so mentally defective as to be incapable of managing that individual’s affairs and to require supervision, control, and care for that individual’s own or the public welfare.

“Plain view” means the handgun is placed in such a location or carried in such a position as to be easily discernible by the ordinary observation of a passerby. In a motor vehicle, this includes being placed on the seat, dashboard, or in a gunrack as long as the handgun is not covered or is in any other way concealed from view.

“Rifle” means any firearm designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and using the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each pull of the trigger.

“Secured” means the firearm is closed into the trunk or nonpassenger part of the vehicle; placed into a closed and secure carrying device; rendered inoperative by the use of a trigger, hammer, cylinder, slide, or barrel-locking device that renders the firearm incapable of firing until the device is unlocked and removed; or so disassembled or disabled as to be rendered incapable of firing.

“Short-barreled rifle” means a rifle having one or more barrels less than sixteen inches [40.64 centimeters] in length and any firearm made from a rifle, whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise, if the firearm, as modified, has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches [66.04 centimeters].

“Short-barreled shotgun” means a shotgun having one or more barrels less than eighteen inches [45.72 centimeters] in length and any firearm made from a shotgun, whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise, if the firearm, as modified, has an overall length of less than twenty-six inches [66.04 centimeters].

“Shotgun” means a firearm designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired with one hand below or behind and one hand in front of the breach, which uses the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth or a rifled bore either a number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

“Silencer” means any device for or attached to any firearm which will silence or deaden the sound or natural report of the firearm when it is discharged.

“Unloaded” means the chamber of the firearm does not contain a loaded shell. If the firearm is a revolver, then none of the chambers in the cylinder may contain a loaded shell.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 3; 1987, ch. 532, § 6; 1995, ch. 602, § 1; 2011, ch. 501, § 1; 2013, ch. 491, §§ 2, 3; 2015, ch. 475, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 476, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 428, § 1, effective April 12, 2017; 2017, ch. 97, § 31, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 516, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 517, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Hunting, entry on posted land with firearm as prima facie evidence, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-20.

Hunting, guns usable in taking raccoons with flashlight, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-01-09.

Hunting or trapping within refuge prohibited, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-11-13.

Hunting, special permits to shoot wildlife from stationary motor vehicle, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-02-05.

Injuries inflicted with guns, reporting required, see N.D.C.C. § 43-17-41.

Minimum terms for armed offenders, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-02.1.

Right to bear arms, see N.D. Const., art. I, § 1.

Propane exploders, restrictions on use, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 20.1-04-14.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

62.1-01-02.
Forfeiture of dangerous weapon or firearm by person arrested and convicted of crime.

Any firearm or dangerous weapon used or possessed while in the commission of a felony or a misdemeanor involving violence or intimidation must be seized and, upon conviction and by motion, forfeited to the jurisdiction in which the arrest was made or the jurisdiction in which the charge arose. Except as provided in chapter 29-01 for stolen property, the forfeited dangerous weapon may be, pursuant to court order, sold at public auction, sold or traded to other law enforcement agencies or dealers, retained for use, or destroyed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law; and subject to the duty to return firearms to innocent owners under this section, section 29-31.1-02, and as provided in chapter 29-01 for stolen property; all firearms, as defined in section 62.1-01-01, which are forfeited, recovered as stolen and unclaimed, or abandoned to any law enforcement agency of this state or a political subdivision of this state, including the game and fish department, or that are otherwise acquired by the state or a political subdivision of the state and are no longer needed, shall be disposed of as provided in this section. Except as provided in chapter 29-01 for stolen property, this section does not apply to firearms that are seized or confiscated and disposed of under chapter 20.1-10.

Before the disposal of any firearm under this section, the agency with custody of the firearm shall use its best efforts to determine if the firearm has been lost by, or stolen or otherwise unlawfully obtained from, an innocent owner and, if so, shall provide notification to the innocent owner of its custody of the firearm. An innocent owner may also notify the agency to claim a firearm.

After notification, the agency shall return the firearm to its innocent owner provided the owner submits sufficient proof of ownership, as determined by the agency, and pays the costs, if any, of returning the firearm to the innocent owner. Costs are limited to the actual costs of shipping to the innocent owner and associated costs from any transfer and background check fees charged when delivering the firearm to the innocent owner.

If six months elapse after notification to the innocent owner of the custody of the firearm by an agency and the innocent owner fails to bear the costs of return of his or her firearm or fails to respond to the agency notification, or if six months elapse after notice of a claim by an innocent owner and the innocent owner fails to bear the costs of return of the innocent owner’s firearm or take away the innocent owner’s firearm, then the agency shall dispose of the firearm as provided in this section.

Except as provided in subdivision b of subsection 3 or subsection 5, the agency shall dispose of the firearms that it receives under subsection 2 by sale at public auction to persons that may lawfully possess a firearm and persons licensed as firearms collectors, dealers, importers, or manufacturers under the provisions of 18 U.S.C. section 921 et seq., and authorized to receive such firearms under the terms of the licenses.

The auction required by this subsection may occur online on a rolling basis or at live events, but in no event may the auction occur less frequently than once every year during any time the agency has an inventory of saleable firearms. The agency shall establish a procedure to notify persons of its auctions.

The agency may not retain proceeds above that which are necessary to cover the costs of administering this subsection, with any surplus to be transferred to the general fund of the jurisdiction in which the agency is located, provided that an agency may be reimbursed for any firearms formerly in use by the agency that are sold under this section.

Employees of the agency are not eligible to bid on the firearms at an auction conducted under this subsection, and except for the amounts authorized under subdivision c of this subsection, neither the agency nor its employees may retain any proceeds from any sale required by this subsection, nor may the agency or its employees retain any firearm required to be sold under this subsection.

The requirements of subsection 4 do not apply to a firearm if there are not any bids from eligible persons received within six months from when bidding opened on the firearm, or if the agency director, sheriff, chief of police, or a designee of the official certifies that the firearm is unsafe for use because of wear, damage, age, or modification or because any federal or state law prohibits the sale or distribution of the firearm. The agency director, sheriff, chief of police, or a designee of the official, may transfer any of these firearms to the attorney general’s crime laboratory for training or experimental purposes, or to a museum or historical society that displays these items to the public and is lawfully eligible to receive the firearm, or the firearm may be destroyed. The requirements of subsection 4 do not apply to a firearm and an agency director, sheriff, chief of police, or a designee of the official may destroy the firearm, if:

The firearm was used in a violent crime, in an accidental shooting, or a self-inflicted shooting resulting in the death of an individual;

There is not a claim for the firearm by an innocent owner; and

A family member of the deceased individual makes a written request for the destruction of the firearm.

Agencies subject to the provisions of this subsection may establish a procedure to destroy firearms and may expend necessary funds for that purpose.

All agencies subject to the provisions of this section shall keep records of the firearms acquired and disposed of as provided in this section, as well as the proceeds of the sales and the disbursement of the proceeds, and shall maintain these records for not less than ten years from the date on which a firearm is disposed of or on which a disbursement of funds is made, as the case may be.

Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state, nor any of their officers, agents, and employees, is liable to any person, including the purchaser of a firearm, for personal injuries or damage to property arising from the sale or disposal of a firearm under subsection 4 or 5 of this section, unless an officer, agent, or employee of the state or political subdivision acted with gross negligence or recklessness.

As used in this section, the term “innocent owner” means a person who:

Did not beforehand know or in the exercise of ordinary care would not have known of the conduct which caused that person’s firearm to be forfeited, seized, or abandoned to any law enforcement agency of the state or any political subdivision of the state, including the game and fish department;

Did not participate in the commission of a crime or delinquent act involving that person’s firearm;

Legally owned and presently owns the firearm forfeited, seized, or abandoned; and

Is authorized by state and federal law to receive and possess his or her firearm.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 3; 2015, ch. 477, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Notes.

Section 2 of chapter 477, S.L. 2015 provides,
“

APPLICATION.

Any firearm held by an agency on August 1, 2015, is subject to the disposal and sale provisions of this Act.”

Cross-References.

Temporary questioning of persons in public places, search for weapons, see N.D.C.C. § 29-29-21.

Search of accused for weapons, see N.D.C.C. §§ 29-06-24, 29-29-20.

Collateral References.

Forfeiture of weapon unlawfully carried before trial of individual offender, 3 A.L.R.2d 738.

62.1-01-03.
Limitation on authority of political subdivision regarding firearms — Civil action.

A political subdivision, including home rule cities or counties, may not enact a zoning ordinance or any other ordinance relating to the purchase, sale, ownership, possession, transfer of ownership, registration, or licensure of firearms and ammunition which is more restrictive than state law. All such existing ordinances are void.

A person aggrieved under subsection 1 may bring a civil action against a political subdivision for damages as a result of an unlawful ordinance.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 683, § 3; 2013, ch. 491, § 4; 2021, ch. 494, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

62.1-01-03.1.
Federal firearms laws — Limitations on enforcement.

As used in this section, “firearm accessory” means an item used in conjunction with or mounted on a firearm but is not essential to the basic function of a firearm. The term includes a detachable firearm magazine.

An agency or political subdivision of the state and a law enforcement officer or individual employed by an agency or political subdivision of the state may not provide assistance to a federal agency or official or act independently with respect to the investigation, prosecution, or enforcement of a violation of a federal statute, order, rule, or regulation purporting to regulate a firearm, firearm accessory, or firearm ammunition enacted after January 1, 2021, if the federal statute, order, rule, or regulation is more restrictive than state law, unless:

The federal agency appeals to the federal district court of the federal district in which the violation or possible violation occurred or would occur and the court finds probable cause that a national security threat exists;

The violation also is a violation under this title; or

The violation also is a violation of chapter 12.1-16, 12.1-17, 12.1-18, 12.1-20, 12.1-41, or 19-03.1.

This section does not prohibit an agency or political subdivision of the state or a law enforcement officer or individual employed by an agency or political subdivision of the state from providing assistance to a federal agency or official for an offense not related to firearms or an offense to which firearms are incidental, including a drug offense, homicide, assault, kidnapping, sex offense, or human trafficking.

This section does not prohibit law enforcement from providing assistance to a federal agency or official if the investigation also pertains to a felony violation of state law.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 495, § 1, effective April 23, 2021.

62.1-01-04.
Firearm buyback program — Prohibited.

As used in this section, “firearm buyback program” means a program to purchase privately owned firearms, firearm parts, or ammunition from private individuals or organizations for the purpose of providing cash, gifts, or vouchers; or reducing the number of firearms, firearm parts, or ammunition owned by civilians; or permitting a civilian to sell a firearm to the government without fear of prosecution. The term does not include the purchase of firearms, firearm parts, or ammunition from a licensed firearms dealer, or a program to purchase firearms, firearm parts, or ammunition for law enforcement purposes.

A state agency, political subdivision, or any law enforcement agency of this state may not conduct a firearm buyback program or participate in the implementation, administration, or operation of a firearm buyback program.

A state agency, political subdivision, or any law enforcement agency of this state may not expend any taxpayer dollars for the purpose of implementing, administering, or otherwise operating a firearm buyback program.

A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 518, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.